Nevada, session 83, AB151.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 179D.0357 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
179D.0357 “Crime against a child” means any of the following
offenses if the victim of the offense was less than 18 years of age
when the offense was committed:
1. Kidnapping pursuant to NRS 200.310 to 200.340, inclusive,
unless the offender is the parent or guardian of the victim.
2. False imprisonment pursuant to NRS 200.460, unless the
offender is the parent or guardian of the victim.
3. Involuntary servitude of a child pursuant to NRS 200.4631,
unless the offender is the parent or guardian of the victim.
4. An offense involving sex trafficking pursuant to subsection
2 of NRS 201.300 or prostitution pursuant to NRS 201.320 ,
subsection 2 of NRS 201.354 or NRS 201.395.
5. An attempt to commit an offense listed in this section.
6. An offense committed in another jurisdiction that, if
committed in this State, would be an offense listed in this section.
This subsection includes, without limitation, an offense prosecuted
in:
(a) A tribal court.
(b) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States.
7. An offense against a child committed in another jurisdiction,
whether or not the offense would be an offense listed in this section,
if the person who committed the offense resides or has resided or is
or has been a student or worker in any jurisdiction in which the
person is or has been required by the laws of that jurisdiction to
register as an offender who has committed a crime against a child
because of the offense. This subsection includes, without limitation,
an offense prosecuted in:
(a) A tribal court.
(b) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(c) A court having jurisdiction over juveniles.
Sec. 2. NRS 179D.097 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179D.097 1. “Sexual offense” means any of the following
offenses:
(a) Murder of the first degree committed in the perpetration or
attempted perpetration of sexual assault or of sexual abuse or sexual
molestation of a child less than 14 years of age pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.030.
(b) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
-
*AB151*

– 3 –
(c) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368.
(d) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 200.400.
(e) An offense involving the administration of a drug to another
person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of a felony
pursuant to NRS 200.405, if the felony is an offense listed in this
subsection.
(f) An offense involving the administration of a controlled
substance to another person with the intent to enable or assist the
commission of a crime of violence, if the crime of violence is an
offense listed in this section.
(g) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation.
(h) An offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant to
NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive.
(i) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 200.975.
(j) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180.
(k) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210.
(l) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220.
(m) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230.
(n) Solicitation for prostitution, other than soliciting a child
for prostitution, pursuant to NRS 201.354.
(o) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450.
[(o)] (p) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school
or volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
[(p)] (q) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college
or university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
[(q)] (r) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant
to NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.
[(r)] (s) Sex trafficking pursuant to NRS 201.300.
[(s)] (t) Any other offense that has an element involving a
sexual act or sexual conduct with another.
[(t)] (u) An attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense listed in
paragraphs (a) to [(s),] (t), inclusive.
[(u)] (v) An offense that is determined to be sexually motivated
pursuant to NRS 175.547 or 207.193.
[(v)] (w) An offense committed in another jurisdiction that, if
committed in this State, would be an offense listed in this
subsection. This paragraph includes, without limitation, an offense
prosecuted in:
(1) A tribal court.
(2) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States.
-
*AB151*

– 4 –
[(w)] (x) An offense of a sexual nature committed in another
jurisdiction, whether or not the offense would be an offense listed in
this section, if the person who committed the offense resides or has
resided or is or has been a student or worker in any jurisdiction in
which the person is or has been required by the laws of that
jurisdiction to register as a sex offender because of the offense. This
paragraph includes, without limitation, an offense prosecuted in:
(1) A tribal court.
(2) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(3) A court having jurisdiction over juveniles.
2. Except for the offenses described in paragraphs [(o)] (p) and
[(p)] (q) of subsection 1, the term does not include an offense
involving consensual sexual conduct if the victim was:
(a) An adult, unless the adult was under the custodial authority
of the offender at the time of the offense; or
(b) At least 13 years of age and the offender was not more than
4 years older than the victim at the time of the commission of the
offense.
Sec. 3. NRS 179D.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179D.115 “Tier II offender” means an offender convicted of a
crime against a child or a sex offender, other than a Tier III
offender, whose crime against a child is punishable by
imprisonment for more than 1 year or whose sexual offense:
1. If committed against a child, constitutes:
(a) Luring a child pursuant to NRS 201.560, if punishable as a
felony;
(b) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation;
(c) An offense involving sex trafficking pursuant to NRS
201.300 or prostitution pursuant to NRS 201.320 , subsection 2 of
NRS 201.354 or NRS 201.395;
(d) An offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant to
NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive; or
(e) Any other offense that is comparable to or more severe than
the offenses described in 34 U.S.C. § 20911(3);
2. Involves an attempt or conspiracy to commit any offense
described in subsection 1;
3. If committed in another jurisdiction, is an offense that, if
committed in this State, would be an offense listed in this section.
This subsection includes, without limitation, an offense prosecuted
in:
(a) A tribal court; or
(b) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of the
United States; or
-
*AB151*

– 5 –
4. Is committed after the person becomes a Tier I offender if
any of the person’s sexual offenses constitute an offense punishable
by imprisonment for more than 1 year.
Sec. 4. NRS 179D.495 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179D.495 If a person who is required to register pursuant to
NRS 179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive, has been convicted of an
offense described in paragraph [(s)] (t) of subsection 1 of NRS
179D.097, paragraph (e) of subsection 1 or subsection 3 of NRS
179D.115 or subsection 7 or 9 of NRS 179D.117, the Central
Repository shall determine whether the person is required to register
as a Tier I offender, Tier II offender or Tier III offender.
Sec. 5. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to offenses
committed before, on or after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB151*